District of Columbia statutes.
36-154

Use or possession of vessel without purchase of contents prima facie evidence of unlawful use.

The use or possession by any person not engaged in the production or sale of beverage as aforesaid, except the person who shall so have filed and published a description of the same as aforesaid, of any vessel marked or distinguished as aforesaid, the description of which shall have been filed and published as aforesaid, without purchase of the contents thereof from, or the written consent of, the person who shall so have filed and published the said description, shall be prima facie evidence of the unlawful use, possession of, or traffic in, such vessel, and the person so using or in possession of the same, except the person who shall so have filed and published the said description as aforesaid, shall be punished as provided in § 36-153.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 878d
Feb. 27, 1907, 34 Stat. 1007, ch. 2086
1981 Ed., § 48-304.
1973 Ed., § 48-304.